District of Columbia statutes.
16-4021

Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History

May 9, 2012, D.C. Law 19-125, § 2(b), 59 DCR 1928

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 21 of the Uniform Collaborative Law Act.